test/src/morphology/V-vuejted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - vuejted: # Verb 'to drive,  causative' - full paradigm
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuejtam
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuejtak
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuejat
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vuejtep
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vuejteˊped
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuejte 
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+4: vuejtet

     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuejtem
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuejtiǩ
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuejti
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [vuejtim, vuejtin]
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuejtid
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuejte
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+4: vuejteš

     vuejted+V+Pot+Sg1: vuejteˊžem
     vuejted+V+Pot+Sg2: vuejteˊžiǩ
     vuejted+V+Pot+Sg3: vuejtež
     vuejted+V+Pot+Pl1: [vuejteˊžep, vuejteˊžim]
     vuejted+V+Pot+Pl2: vuejteˊžid 
     vuejted+V+Pot+Pl3: vuejteˊže
     vuejted+V+Pot+4: vuejteˊžet
     vuejted+V+Pot+ConNeg: vuejteˊže

     vuejted+V+Cond+Sg1: vuejteˊčem
     vuejted+V+Cond+Sg2: vuejteˊčiǩ
     vuejted+V+Cond+Sg3: vuejteˊči
     vuejted+V+Cond+Pl1: [vuejteˊčim, vuejteˊčep]
     vuejted+V+Cond+Pl2: vuejteˊčid
     vuejted+V+Cond+Pl3: vuejteˊče
     vuejted+V+Cond+4: vuejteˊčeš
     vuejted+V+Cond+ConNeg: vuejteˊče

     vuejted+V+Imp+Sg2: vuejat
     vuejted+V+Imp+Sg3: vuejtââǥǥas
     vuejted+V+Imp+Pl1: vuejtâkap
     vuejted+V+Imp+Pl2: vuejteˊǩed
     vuejted+V+Imp+Pl3: vuejtâkaz
     vuejted+V+Imp+ConNeg: vuejtuku
     vuejted+V+ActEss: vuejteˊmen
     vuejted+V+Action: vuejtam
     vuejted+V+PrsPrc: vuejteei
     vuejted+V+PrfPrc: vuejtam
     vuejted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [vuejtummu, vuejtuum]
     vuejted+V+VAbess: vuejteǩâni
     vuejted+V+GerTemp: vuejteen
     vuejted+V+GerInstr: vuejteeˊl


 
